Louisiana, session 2026, SB153.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1666.1(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1666.1. Extra compensation
A.(1) * * *
(2) The term "employee" as used herein expressly excludes any person hired
primarily to perform secretarial and clerical duties, switchboard operators,
secretaries, record clerks, maintenance personnel, and mechanics; it shall expressly
exclude employees hired after March 31, 1986, who have not completed and passed
a certified fireman's training program from a Pro Board accredited agency or an
International Fire Service Accreditation Congress approved entity equal to National
Fire Protection Association Standard 1010 or 1001 Firefighter I Certification
validated by the Louisiana Fire and Emergency Training Academy in accordance
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-491 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 153
with R.S. 40:1541 et seq.; and it shall also expressly exclude part-time employees
and volunteers of such municipal, parish, tribe, or fire protection district fire
departments; and it shall also expressly exclude employees who do not hold an
active emergency medical responder license or higher issued in accordance with
the provisions of R.S. 40:1133.1 et seq.
* * *